id family group language idiom type genlang_point map chapter value1 feature1 value2 feature2 value3 feature3 value4 feature4 value5 feature5 source page comment contributor form negative form example_as_in_source example gloss translation_as_in_source translation example_source example_page example_comment date 5 Indo-European Armenic Eastern Armenian Eastern Armenian language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands dum-tragut2009 271--277 Vasily Zerzele -ek' mi + ...-ek' https://drive.google.com/file/d/1Pe6r_-tSpzlTmy5mgryanQghiFR8pGx6/view?usp=drive_link ašxatank'ě avartec'ek' žamanakin work.NOM-the complete-IMP.2.PL time-DAT-the Complete the work in time! Complete the work in time! dum-tragut2009 274 02.2024 15 East Caucasian Dargwa Northern Dargwa Standard Dargwa language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands musaev2002 69 Vasily Zerzele -aja/-raja/-ja ma- ... -aja https://drive.google.com/file/d/1caPAMzjRVfPEV6BKy6pW4waBMVT0nWC4/view?usp=drive_link bixa bixaja give.IMP give.IMP-2PL давай давайте give! (you folks) give! musaev2002 69 02.2024 16 East Caucasian Dargwa Southwestern Dargwa Tanti dialect_toplevel yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands sumbatovalander2014 142--144 Vasily Zerzele -a/-ja ma- ... -a/-ja https://drive.google.com/file/d/15QHAAELqm-i0m99EL4svwHs1t1qnlHxo/view?usp=drive_link dilq'enija burn-IMP-PL горите! (you folks) burn! sumbatovalander2014 143 02.2024 18 East Caucasian Dargwa Sanzhi-Itsari Itsari dialect_toplevel yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands sumbatovamutalov2003 71--72 Vasily Zerzele -aja ma- ... -aja https://drive.google.com/file/d/11hmAQ9qGd7NFvkkfBdS7LJg5gwwOaeif/view?usp=drive_link ažraja! go.away-IMP-PL go away!' (you folks) go away! sumbatovamutalov2003 7 02.2024 19 East Caucasian Dargwa Kubachi Kubachi language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives present Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands magometov1963 201--205, 233--236 Plural imperative transitivity split is present in one conjugation only Vasily Zerzele -a: -me- ... -a: https://drive.google.com/file/d/1oWkWfudgw_-tsLjgNtzoL1KjccaC0xcb/view?usp=drive_link baxa: learn-IMP-PL выучите (you folks) learn! magometov1963 202 02.2024 20 Kartvelian Georgic Georgian Standard Georgian language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands hewitt1995 67--68, 446--454 Vasily Zerzele -t nu- ... -t https://drive.google.com/file/d/1W-vmFb-5_LTvPqBnRiuX5GitlWYhOoq1/view?usp=drive_link mo-di - mo-di-t come-AOR.IND-PL come (you folks) come! hewitt1995 448 02.2024 37 Indo-European Iranian Juhuri Juhuri language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands authier2012 175--176 Vasily Zerzele -it me-...-it https://drive.google.com/file/d/1QfF93h4Cv1TPQn_ErIhf_e6QYzueGNHs/view?usp=drive_link yekem poyit! a_little (IMP)stand-2PL Attendez un peu! (you folks) wait a little! authier2012 175 02.2024 42 East Caucasian Lezgic Udi Nizh dialect_toplevel yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands alekseevetal2008 150 example source: http://udilang.narod.ru/texts/uditalk.htm Vasily Zerzele -inan/anan ma-...-inan/anan https://drive.google.com/file/d/1TfLZ7Dzf_g2v5gK_oD3hDWkV40X-sKx6/view?usp=drive_link äyč’ä ekinan beši k’oya tomorrow come:IMP-IMP-2PL we:POSS house:DAT Приходи(те) к нам завтра. (you folks) come here tommorow maisak2006 3 02.2024 13 East Caucasian Nakh Chechen Standard Chechen language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands molochieva2010 251--256 The suffix -ash for the second person plural imperative originates from the second person plural pronoun shu/ash, e.g. mala ash ‘You drink!’ Vasily Zerzele -ash ma- ... -ash https://drive.google.com/file/d/1jD2D3i1ghTB7j1t5IA8T2iSkVqJ7lEIN/view?usp=drive_link chai malash! tea drink-IMP.2PL Drink tea! (only for 2PL) (you folks) drink tea! molochieva2010 251 02.2024 41 East Caucasian Nakh Tsova-Tush Zemo-Alvani village yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands holiskygagua1994 27 Vasily Zerzele -a-...-t ma + ...-a-...-t https://drive.google.com/file/d/1JSbti89HmplAUF-Ht2PdNk64VzIZMHKm/view?usp=drive_link x:apsat! look-IMP.2PL многие посмотрите! (you folks) look! desheriev1953 150 02.2024 7 Turkic Oghuz Azerbaijani Standard Azerbaijani language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands shiralievsevortyan1971 114--117 Vasily Zerzele -ın/-in/-un/-yn -ma/mə + -yın https://drive.google.com/file/d/1jSBeJabSNupkl_7NMcw-tj7xg47HKx39/view?usp=drive_link gorxmajın, gorxmajın """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""hop-hopdan"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" oxutdurun fear-NEG-IMP.2PL fear-NEG-IMP.2PL hop.hop-ABL read-CAUS-IMP.2PL Не бойтесь, не бойтесь, дайте прочесть им из """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""Хоп-Хоп"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" Don't be afraid, don't be afraid, let them read (something) from """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""Hop-Hop"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" shiralievsevortyan1971 116 02.2024 17 East Caucasian Dargwa Chirag Chirag language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives general plural marking Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands ganenkov2021draft Nina Dobrushina -ja -tːa https://drive.google.com/file/d/1DpJ-w-bQYbMl_tk8Irkh7b8Jfnh6yCUs/view?usp=drive_link ca čuja b-ic-a-ja one ram(ABS) N.SG-sell:PF-IMP-PL ‘Sell (pl.) one ram!’ ‘Sell (pl.) one ram!’ ganenkov2021draft 02.2024 3 East Caucasian Andic Upper Andi Rikvani village yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives present Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands suleymanov1957 384--390 Vasily Zerzele -ol/-vl/-avl/-l -ssu + (b/vl) https://drive.google.com/file/d/1TlBbGNkZRF7jv6Qol6n0_zSDUGyZwZwo/view?usp=drive_link bisːil halt'unniwl žeɬːal! 2pl work-IMP.PL today вы поработайте сегодня (you folks) work today! suleymanov1957 388 02.2024 11 East Caucasian Lezgic Budukh Budukh language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands talibov2007 202--208 Vasily Zerzele -de/-da -m- ... -de/da https://drive.google.com/file/d/16o8e3ZQBaMT07MvIZavwywP-ZtgRWXNq/view?usp=drive_link ap'qχ’ːulda sit.IMP-PL сесть to sit/(you folks (male)) sit! talibov2007 205 02.2024 38 East Caucasian Andic Tindi Tindi village yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives present Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands magomedova2012 165--168 Vasily Zerzele -i/-ibi/-imi -bisi/-ibisi https://drive.google.com/file/d/1i6s4ZXBhoOLKRzul2_8Ck0waiZ5pIH_4/view?usp=drive_link wahimi M-see-IMP.2PL (you all) look! (you folks) look! authier2020 23 02.2024 14 East Caucasian Dargwa Mehweb Mehweb language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands dobrushina2019 122--123, 127--129 Vasily Zerzele -na ma- ... -adi-na https://drive.google.com/file/d/1Q5y7YsUTp0LgHVqcrboZSmNESAZWahHR/view?usp=drive_link waˤbʡana rasul! M-kill:PFV-IMP.TR-IMP.PL Rasul Kill Rasul (adressing to several people)! Kill Rasul (adressing to several people)! dobrushina2019 123 02.2024 29 East Caucasian Lezgic Kryz Alik dialect_toplevel yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands authier2009 152--153 Vasily Zerzele -aj ma-...-aj https://drive.google.com/file/d/1zyImqmiMCcTFN6aqcjj4SBNpQiaGxckm/view?usp=drive_link ğinahnaˤ ğabq’ilay ! to.night PV-HPL-stay.IMP-HPL Couchez-vous ce soir! (you folks) go to bed! authier2009 153 02.2024 36 East Caucasian Lezgic Tabasaran Standard Tabasaran language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on prohibitives none Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present on both Plural marking on commands magometov1965 273--277 Vasily Zerzele -aj mV- ... -an/än + -aj https://drive.google.com/file/d/1LnKryuOcej40K5ozi56NoYV-pfCbGhsC/view?usp=drive_link ap'inaj! do.IMP-2-PL сделайте! (you folks) do (it)! magometov1965 275 02.2024 30 Turkic Kipchak Kumyk Standard Kumyk language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present only on imperatives Plural marking on commands abdullaevaetal2014 288 Vasily Zerzele -ɯʁɯz/-igiz/-uguz/-ygyz https://drive.google.com/file/d/1QflUnBZfAgQcIZzb7ORDPnfgbmj0Tfch/view?usp=drive_link qojɯʁɯz leave-2PL.IMP оставьте (you folks) leave (it) abdullaevaetal2014 288 02.2024 33 Turkic Kipchak Nogai Standard Nogai language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives general plural marking Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present only on imperatives Plural marking on commands baskakov1973 244--246 Vasily Zerzele -yŋyz/-iŋiz/-ŋiz https://drive.google.com/file/d/1kL0to_CAGLoM70egBncBr3Pk3eU1TkrB/view?usp=drive_link søjle-ŋiz speak-2PL.IMP Говорите (you folks) speak baskakov1973 245 02.2024 12 East Caucasian Andic Chamalal Lower Gakvari dialect_toplevel yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives present Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present only on imperatives Plural marking on commands bokarev1949a 93--95 УДАЛ-АЛ нареч. по сторонам; удал-ал бац1инхъала не смотрите по сторонам (magomedova1999) Vasily Zerzele -bi/-mi https://drive.google.com/file/d/1QqY32TPNOI8PRspzH9SKKEwnnNf-9syc/view?usp=drive_link sulalbe, sulalbi shame-IMP shame-IMP.PL стыдись! стыдитесь! feel ashamed! (you folks) feel ashamed! bokarev1949a 94 02.2024 25 East Caucasian Andic Karata Anchiq dialect_toplevel no yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives present Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present only on imperatives Plural marking on commands Konstantin Filatov, p.c. Nina Dobrushina -i / -u - abi/ibi/ebi https://docs.google.com/document/d/1B7lKZQY9k2z-zH4zGKQ9kT9GUhdpAOJL/edit?usp=drive_link&ouid=102165108159653135851&rtpof=true&sd=true χːeχːala b-exʷ-abi ešq-a-r fast HPL-come-IMP.PL home-SUP-LAT ‘Быстро приходите домой’ Come home quickly Konstantin Filatov, p.c. 02.2024 27 East Caucasian Khinalug Khinalug Khinalug language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present only on imperatives Plural marking on commands desheriev1959 93--96 Vasily Zerzele -ejlun/-ejlus/-f/-ɯn -ku https://drive.google.com/file/d/1iMhdA-LJ6A5pL9WclmvI3lpTZVLSb67F/view?usp=drive_link aj, ləgələr, ħavar afər! hey, man-NOM.PL , up go.INTR.IMP Эй, мужчины, вверх идите! Hey, men, go up! desheriev1959 96 02.2024 31 East Caucasian Lak Lak Standard Lak language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives none Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present only on imperatives Plural marking on commands kazenin2013 268 Vasily Zerzele -(ya)ra ma- ...ari https://drive.google.com/file/d/1OtCAnGnhMJxUaSK9AKVAxHYOX8aOw5C8/view?usp=drive_link bačijara šivunmaj come-IMP.2PL here Идите сюда (you folks) come here kazenin2013 268 02.2024 4 East Caucasian Lezgic Archi Archi language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives plural marking dedicated to commands Plural marking on imperatives present Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives present only on imperatives Plural marking on commands kibrik1977 93--96 Vasily Zerzele -r https://drive.google.com/file/d/1nLfdE-FA8XxblZUXzAnzxOzj12Ek0pnT/view?usp=drive_link óci - ócir stop - stop-IMP.PL останавливаться to stop; (you folks) stop! kibrik1977 95 02.2024 2 East Caucasian Andic Northern Akhvakh Axaxdərə dialect_toplevel yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands creisselsquest2008 1 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/16l7jEYb6gKmhzA2gkF8st9sffeRVr9AQ/view?usp=drive_link ap'ada ʁurus̄̌ːi ox̄:a q̄':aziɬ̄:a! ten rouble N-give-IMP debt-N-LAT Lend me ten roubles! (You folks) Lend me ten roubles! creisselsquest2008 1 02.2024 8 East Caucasian Andic Bagvalal Kvanada village yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands kibrik2001 96--98, 319--331 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/134aiw_kOT5RvCak72mwkYTg92QyKKcT1/view?usp=drive_link ob bis̄̌dibda partal baχ̄a bahā bebeRaladi - heL'i os̄̌ur this=N you=GEN.N=DA stuff N=away N=take.POT.INF HPL=come-IMP-RALA-DI say this -OBL.M-ERG Те ваши вещи приходите забрать, - сказал он. Come pick up this stuff of yours - he said kibrik2001 321 02.2024 10 East Caucasian Andic Botlikh Botlikh village yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands alexeyevverheesdraft2020 NA (18) Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1lLIxBEfebBn4GQOMmR_GuS4iIdJsZoA_/view?usp=drive_link t'orgudaluj ikka raaɬi everyone-PL-DAT give clothes всем раздайте одежду (you folks) give clothes to everyone saidovaabusov 551 02.2024 21 East Caucasian Andic Godoberi Godoberi language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands kibriketal1996 106 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1Cidx9tAIBS4OIfq81GbY8J199XTywsuF/view?usp=drive_link dub Xuri beL'á you.OBL=GEN.N field N=plough-IMP Plough your field! Plough your field! kibriketal1996 106 02.2024 26 East Caucasian Andic Karata Karata dialect_toplevel yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands magomedbekova1971 134--135, 150--151 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1GpVPUDssUdkmKI76VYw2X2Cf84WOl0V6/view?usp=drive_link bišdi-bišdjada ʕamal gaaha 2PL.each worry do.IMP побеспокойтесь каждый о себе each one of you worry about yourself magomedovaхalidova2001 78 02.2024 6 East Caucasian Avar Avar Standard Avar language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands forkerdraft2020 11--12 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1_ZFB5eyDzhBubzXfrWqrygNcCwVa4cuR/view?usp=drive_link a durgo amma duca dosda kʷer qʷage go.imp 2.gen=emph but 2sg-erg dem-obl-spr hand scratch-proh Go, but don't convince him with your hand! Go, but don't convince him with your hand! forkerdraft2020 12 02.2024 1 East Caucasian Lezgic Agul Huppuq' dialect_toplevel yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands maisakmerdanova2002b 44 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1yom0HBO3GQR6jknbap9hX0IAc8WdbVpc/view?usp=drive_link с̌e dada с̌as hamiša aRafij: sajisra ʡajʕel maq’a, ze balajar! 3PL(E) father:ERG 3PL-DAT always say.IPF-A-COP:PST one-DAT=and evil PROH-do.IPF my child-PL Наш отец всегда, бывало, говаривал: никому зла не делайте, дети мои! Our father always said: """"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""never do evil, my children!"""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" maisakmerdanova2002b 35 02.2024 32 East Caucasian Lezgic Lezgian Standard Lezgian language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands haspelmath1993 149--150 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1FlkZztFL68JPB2kG-Mti2BBqCJQFY7sO/view?usp=drive_link aq̄waz, ja juldošar zaqʰ jab akala stop-IMP PT comrade-PL 1sg-POESS ear attach-IMP Stop, comrades, listen to me Stop, comrades, listen to me haspelmath1993 249 02.2024 34 East Caucasian Lezgic Rutul Mukhad dialect_toplevel yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands maxmudova2002 159 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/10YeKpHgka8M657v1U7MkJxRQPAmvMa77/view?usp=drive_link dytɬ'a MPL-come.IMP приходите (you folks) come maxmudova2002 159 02.2024 39 East Caucasian Lezgic Tsakhur Mishlesh village yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands kibrik1999 279--280 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/17ND_S6NMdJ5oxgz2u4G0DBRFG3dvse2U/view?usp=drive_link šu ǯad Xaw aljeʔe 2PL.ERG RESTR=4 house.4 4.build-IMP Вы сами дом стройте! you (folks) build (your) house yourself! kibrik1999 130 02.2024 24 East Caucasian Nakh Ingush Standard Ingush language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands nichols2011 274--275 Several degrees of politeness for imperatives. All except for 'future imperative' are not marked for plurality. Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/15K6KpzsGmNEC2bp9HDSWvaaF2HrgwsRP/view?usp=drive_link naaxaga dwa cy hwuoqazh shoazhta wa-jaazdie (other) people.ALL DX NEG show.CVsim 3pRFL.DAT DX-write-IMP If you don't show it to others at least write it down yourselves. If you don't show it to others at least write it down yourselves. nichols2011 468 02.2024 35 East Caucasian Rutul Rutul Khnov village no yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands authier2023 34--35 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1rTQCyAmWoduiHnWca-bULV8otLJuVg7I/view?usp=drive_link viˤ qhidvira 2PL.NOM re-HPL-go.IMP You all, go back! You all, go back! authier2023 34--35 02.2024 9 East Caucasian Tsezic Bezhta Bezhta village yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands comrieetal2015 378--380 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1YfhvcJKmM821VNd1ktbGdljvN4jDceZu/view?usp=drive_link boɬo ʁoƛːoʔos! leave.IMP here уходите отсюда! get out of here! xalilov2015 88 02.2024 23 East Caucasian Tsezic Hunzib Hunzib language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands vandenberg1995 87--88 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1CNuiqDm9VMvfclt0JP8TZe-QyqtFxnSh/view?usp=drive_link isna, tus eče sibiling-PL come-IMP politely brothers, come with me, please brothers, come, please vandenberg1995 88 02.2024 28 East Caucasian Tsezic Khwarshi Kvantlada village yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands khalilova2009 242--245 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1o3u5HyXridrGkJfCiFUBsjEfgfQsgf2z/view?usp=drive_link mok'o HPL-go-IMP You (plural) go! You (plural) go! khalilova2009 245 02.2024 40 East Caucasian Tsezic Tsez Kidero dialect_nt1 yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands imnajshvili1963 190 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1dbXwUiQ1bJe0WQI7LAmeD_BU_y3Zg_1k/view?usp=drive_link horo int'or! come.IMP here иди(те) сюда! (you folks) come here! xalilov1999 185 02.2024 22 East Caucasian Tsezic Hinuq Hinuq language yes yes plural marking on imperatives and prohibitives unmarked Plural marking on imperatives not applicable Transitivity distinction in plural imperatives unmarked Plural marking on prohibitives not applicable Transitivity distinction in prohibitives not present Plural marking on commands forker2013 227--230 Vasily Zerzele https://drive.google.com/file/d/1FFNOBgu4lFM5UceDJPYLlyIjQOvODtX5/view?usp=drive_link ħalt'oz avara bujom! work interfere-IMP do-NEG не мешай (те) работать! don't interfere with the work! xalilovisakov2005 42 02.2024